Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-123
Dawes.

The county of Dawes is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southeast corner of township twenty-nine, north, of range forty-seven, west of the sixth principal meridian; thence west to the southwest corner of township twenty-nine, north, of range fifty-two west; thence north on the range line between ranges fifty-two and fifty-three to the northern boundary line of the State of Nebraska; thence east along said boundary to the line between ranges forty-six and forty-seven west; thence south on said range line to the point of beginning.

Laws 1885, c. 32, § 1, p. 206;

R.S.1913, § 836;

Laws 1921, c. 231, § 2, p. 823;

C.S.1922, § 738;

C.S.1929, § 25-125;

R.S.1943, § 22-123.